Illinois, session 104th, HB3761.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Centralized information on continuum of care 8access.9    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:10        (1) There are persistent adverse health effects that 11    individuals often endure after experiencing homelessness 12    even for a short period of time.13        (2) Patients who are receiving medical care at a 14    hospital or other health care provider and are 15    experiencing homelessness, or are otherwise in a 16    vulnerable housing situation, would benefit from 17    information on shelter and homeless support services.18        (3) There are opportunities to improve systems of care 19    for individuals experiencing homelessness in Illinois.20    (b) The Office to Prevent and End Homelessness within the 21Department of Human Services shall maintain on the 22Department's publicly accessible website information on how a 23hospital or health care provider may connect a patient who is   HB3761 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11105 KTG 21187 b1experiencing homelessness, or is otherwise in a vulnerable 2housing situation, with shelter and homeless support services 3for each continuum of care in the State. As used in this 4Section, "continuum of care" means a regional or local 5planning body mandated by the U.S. Department of Housing and 6Urban Development that coordinates housing and services 7funding for homeless families and individuals. 8    (c) The Department of Human Services shall ensure that the 9information required under subsection (b) includes, for each 10continuum of care, any phone number, email address, physical 11address, primary agencies, or any other information that may 12be necessary for a person in that continuum of care territory 13to begin accessing shelter or other homeless support services. 14Where possible, the Department shall include a specific phone 15number that a hospital or health care provider may call and 16specific language to use.17    (d) The Department shall also include on its website a way 18for the hospital or health care provider to determine which 19continuum of care applies based on the physical location of 20the hospital or health care provider.21    (e) The Department, in coordination with a statewide 22association representing a majority of hospitals, shall 23establish and offer a voluntary training that shall be 24recorded and made available on the Department's website to all 25hospitals and other health care providers to inform them of 26how a hospital or health care provider may use the   HB3761 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11105 KTG 21187 b1Department's publicly accessible website information to 2connect a patient who is experiencing homelessness, or is 3otherwise in a vulnerable housing situation, with shelter and 4homeless support services.5    (f) The information required under this Section shall be 6added to the portion of the Department's website devoted to 7the Office to Prevent and End Homelessness no later than 8January 31, 2026 and shall be updated as necessary no later 9than every January 31 and July 31 thereafter. These updates 10shall be subject to audits.